California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(i) The commission shall not accept information collected by the commission pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) as evidence in a commission proceeding unless the commission validates the accuracy of the self-reported information.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Broadband” has the same meaning as defined in Section 5830.

(2) “Verified speed test” means a broadband speed performance test result that was measured and verified using a reputable application specified by the commission
 for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 645, Sec. 1.   (AB 286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

282.

Any moneys that are deposited in funds created pursuant to this chapter shall not be used by the state for any purpose other than as specified in this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use the funds created pursuant to this chapter for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code and, upon approval of the Director of Finance, moneys deposited in funds created pursuant to this chapter may be used to make transfers as loans to other funds created pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 75.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

285.

(a) As used in this section, “interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) service” has the same meaning as in Section 9.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the sole purpose of this section is to require the commission to impose the surcharges pursuant to this section to ensure that end-use customers of interconnected VoIP service providers contribute to the funds enumerated in this section, and, therefore, this section does not indicate the intent of the Legislature with respect to any other purpose.

(c) The commission shall require interconnected VoIP service providers to collect and remit surcharges on their California intrastate revenues
 in support of the following public purpose program funds:

(1) California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund under Section 275.

(2) California High-Cost Fund-B Administrative Committee Fund under Section 276.

(3) Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund under Section 277.

(4) Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund under Section 278.

(5) California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund under Section 280.

(6) California Advanced Services Fund under Section 281.

(d) The
 authority to impose a surcharge pursuant to this section applies only to a surcharge imposed on end-use customers for interconnected VoIP service provided to an end-use customer’s place of primary use that is located within California. As used in this subdivision, “place of primary use” means the street address where the end-use customer’s use of interconnected VoIP service primarily occurs, or a reasonable proxy as determined by the interconnected VoIP service provider, such as the customer’s registered location for 911 purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 658, Sec. 3.   (AB 14)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Public Utilities Commission: Organization [301. - 327.]

301.

The membership of the Public Utilities Commission, and the qualifications and tenure of the members of the commission are as provided in Section 1 of Article XII of the Constitution of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 489.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

Each commissioner shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, take and subscribe the constitutional oath of office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

(a) A public utilities commissioner may not hold an official relation to, nor have a financial interest in, a person or corporation subject to regulation by the commission. If any commissioner acquires a financial interest in a corporation or person subject to regulation by the commission other than voluntarily, his or her office shall become vacant unless within a reasonable time he or she divests himself or herself of the interest.

(b) No executive of a public utility may serve as commissioner within two years after leaving the employment of the utility.

(c) The commission shall
 maintain an updated Conflict of Interest Code and Statement of Incompatible Activities in a manner consistent with applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 12.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

304.

The annual salary of each commissioner is provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commissioners shall be civil executive officers, and their salaries as fixed by law shall be paid in the same manner as are the salaries of other state officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

305.

The Governor shall designate a president of the commission from among the members of the commission. The president shall direct the executive director, the attorney, and other staff of the commission, except for the staff of the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, in the performance of their duties, in accordance with commission policies and guidelines. The president shall preside at all meetings and sessions of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 38.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

(a) The office of the commission shall be in the City and County of San Francisco. The office shall always be open, legal holidays and nonjudicial days excepted. The commission shall hold its sessions at least once in each calendar month. The commission may also meet at such other times and in such places as may be expedient and necessary for the proper performance of its duties, and for that purpose may rent quarters or offices.

(b) The meetings of the commission shall be open and public in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

In addition to the requirements of Section 11125 of the Government Code, the commission shall include in its notice of meetings the agenda of business to be transacted, and no item of business shall be added to the agenda subsequent to the notice in the absence of an unforeseen emergency situation. A rate increase shall not constitute an unforeseen emergency situation. As used in this subdivision, “meeting” shall include all investigations, proceedings, and showings required by law to be open and public.

(c) The commission shall have a seal, bearing the inscription “Public Utilities Commission State of California.” The seal shall be affixed to all writs and authentications of copies of records and to such other instruments as the commission shall direct.

(d) The commission may procure all necessary books, maps, charts, stationery, instruments, office furniture, apparatus, and appliances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

(a) The commission may appoint as attorney to the commission an attorney at law of this state, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the commission.

(b) The attorney shall represent and appear for the people of the State of California and the commission in all actions and proceedings involving any question under this part or under any order or act of the commission. If directed to do so by the president, except as otherwise directed by vote of the commission, the attorney
 shall intervene, if possible, in any action or proceeding in which any such question is involved.

(c) The attorney shall commence, prosecute, and expedite the final determination of all actions and proceedings directed or authorized by the president, except as otherwise directed or authorized by vote of the commission, advise the commission and each commissioner, when so requested, in regard to all matters in connection with the powers and duties of the commission and the members thereof, and generally perform all duties and services as attorney to the commission that the president, or vote of the commission, may require of him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

307.2.

There is within the legal division of the commission an ethics officer who shall be designated by the general counsel. The ethics officer shall be responsible for both of the following:

(a) Instituting a program of enhanced ethics training for all commissioners and employees of the commission, including training concerning the
 commission’s Conflict of Interest Code, Statement of Incompatible Activities, and limitations upon ex parte communications.

(b) Providing confidential advice to commissioners and employees of the commission on compliance with the commission’s Conflict of Interest Code, Statement of Incompatible Activities, and limitations upon ex parte communications. The ethics officer shall maintain the confidentiality of the commissioner’s or employee’s identity unless the commissioner or employee expressly indicates a desire to communicate his or her identity to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 13.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

307.5.

(a) The commission shall appoint a chief administrative law judge, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission.

(b) The chief administrative law judge shall be responsible for the oversight of the administrative law judge division and shall organize, coordinate, supervise, and direct the operations of the division as directed by the commission, consistent with commission policies and priorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 14.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

307.6.

(a) The commission shall appoint a chief internal auditor, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission.

(b) The chief internal auditor shall be responsible for the oversight of the internal audit unit and shall plan, initiate, and perform audits of key financial, management, operational, and information technology functions within the commission to improve accountability and transparency to executive and state management.

(c) The chief internal auditor shall report his or her findings and recommendations directly to an audit subcommittee of the commission.

(d) The chief internal auditor shall comply with Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 13885) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 15.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

(a) The commission shall appoint an executive director, who shall hold office during its pleasure. The executive director shall be responsible for the commission’s executive and administrative duties and shall organize, coordinate, supervise, and direct the operations and affairs of the commission and expedite all matters within the commission’s jurisdiction. 

(b) The executive director shall keep a full and true record of all proceedings of the commission, issue all necessary
 process, writs, warrants, and notices, and perform such other duties as the president, or vote of the commission, prescribes. The president may authorize the executive director to dismiss complaints or applications when all parties are in agreement thereto, in accordance with rules that the commission may prescribe.

(c) The commission may appoint assistant executive directors who may serve warrants and other process in any county or city and county of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 509, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

308.5.

Persons employed as investigators and investigator supervisors by the commission, who are designated by the commission’s executive director and approved by the commission, have the authority of peace officers, as specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 830.11 of the Penal Code, while engaged in exercising the powers granted to or performing the duties imposed upon them in investigating the laws, orders, or regulations administered by the commission or commencing directly or indirectly any criminal prosecution arising from any investigation conducted under these laws. All persons herein referred to shall be deemed to be acting within the scope of employment with respect to all acts and matters set forth in this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 5.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

309.

(a) The executive director may employ such officers, administrative law judges, experts, engineers, statisticians, accountants, inspectors, clerks, and employees as the executive director deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this part or to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred upon the commission by law. All officers and employees shall receive such compensation as is fixed by the commission.

(b) The executive director may authorize commission employees to undertake temporary training and development assignments with other agencies, departments, and commissions that undertake coordinated activities with the commission, including the Energy Commission, the State Air Resources Board, and the Geologic Energy Management Division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 21.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

309.1.

The Governor may appoint one adviser for each member of the commission upon the request of the commission member. Each adviser shall receive a salary fixed by the commission with the approval of the Department of Human Resources. The total number of advisers exempt from civil service may not exceed five.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 187.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

309.5.

(a) There is within the commission an independent Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission to represent and advocate on behalf of the interests of public utility customers and subscribers within the jurisdiction of the commission. The goal of the office shall be to obtain the lowest possible rate for service consistent with reliable and safe service levels. For revenue allocation and rate design matters, the office shall primarily consider the interests of residential and small commercial customers.

(b) The director of the office shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

The director shall annually appear before the appropriate policy
 committees of the Assembly and the Senate to report on the activities of the office.

(c) The director shall develop a budget for the office that shall be subject to final approval of the Department of Finance. As authorized in the approved budget, the office shall employ personnel and resources, including attorneys and other legal support staff, at a level sufficient to ensure that customer and subscriber interests are effectively represented in all significant proceedings. The office may employ experts necessary to carry out its functions. The director may appoint a lead attorney who shall represent the office, and shall report to and serve at the pleasure of the director. The lead attorney for the office shall obtain adequate legal personnel for the work to be conducted by the office from the commission’s attorney appointed pursuant to Section 307. The commission’s attorney shall timely and appropriately fulfill all requests for legal
 personnel made by the lead attorney for the office, provided the office has sufficient moneys and positions in its budget for the services requested.

(d) The commission shall develop appropriate procedures to ensure that the existence of the office does not create a conflict of roles for any employee. The procedures shall include, but shall not be limited to, the development of a code of conduct and procedures for ensuring that advocates and their representatives on a particular case or proceeding are not advising decisionmakers on the same case or proceeding.

(e) The office may compel the production or disclosure of any information it deems necessary to perform its duties from any entity regulated by the commission, provided that any objections to any request for information shall be decided in writing by the assigned commissioner or by the president of the commission, if there
 is no assigned commissioner.

(f) There is hereby created the Public Utilities Commission Public Advocate’s Office Account in the General Fund. Moneys from the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account in the General Fund shall be transferred in the annual Budget Act to the Public Utilities Commission Public Advocate’s Office Account. The funds in the Public Utilities Commission Public Advocate’s Office Account shall be a budgetary program fund administered and utilized exclusively by the office in the performance of its duties as determined by the director. The director shall annually submit a staffing report containing a comparison of the staffing levels for each five-year period.

(g) On or before January 10 of each year, the office shall provide to the chairperson of the fiscal committee of each house of the Legislature and to the Joint Legislative Budget
 Committee all of the following information:

(1) The number of personnel years utilized during the prior year by the office.

(2) The total dollars expended by the office in the prior year, the estimated total dollars expended in the current year, and the total dollars proposed for appropriation in the following budget year.

(3) Workload standards and measures for the office.

(h) The office shall meet and confer in an informal setting with a regulated entity prior to issuing a report or pleading to the commission regarding alleged misconduct, or a violation of a law or a commission rule or order, raised by the office in a complaint. The meet and confer process shall be utilized in good faith to reach agreement on issues raised by the office regarding any
 regulated entity in the complaint proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 39.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

309.6.

(a) The commission shall adopt procedures on the disqualification of commissioners and administrative law judges due to bias or prejudice similar to those of other state agencies and superior courts.

(b) (1) For ratesetting and adjudicatory proceedings, a commissioner or administrative law judge shall be disqualified for bias or prejudice based on either of the following:

(A) Actions taken during the proceeding that demonstrate bias or prejudice.

(B) Actions taken outside the public record of a proceeding
 demonstrating any commitment to provide relief to a party.

(2) Past work experience by the commissioner or administrative law judge shall not be a sufficient basis for demonstrating bias or prejudice pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) The commission procedures shall not authorize a commissioner or administrative law judge to rule on a motion made by a party to a proceeding to disqualify the commissioner or administrative law judge due to bias or prejudice.

(d) The commission shall develop the procedures with the opportunity for public review and comment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 807, Sec. 1.   (SB 215)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

309.7.

(a) The division of the commission responsible for railroad safety shall be responsible for inspection, surveillance, and investigation of the rights-of-way, facilities, equipment, and operations of railroads and public mass transit guideways, and for enforcing state and federal laws, regulations, orders, and directives relating to transportation of persons or commodities, or both, of any nature or description by rail. The division of the commission responsible for railroad safety shall advise the commission on all matters relating to rail safety, and shall propose to the commission rules, regulations, orders, and other measures necessary to reduce the dangers caused by unsafe conditions on the railroads of the state. The delegation of enforcement responsibility to the division of the
 commission responsible for railroad safety shall not diminish the power of other agencies of state government to enforce laws relating to employee or environmental safety, pollution prevention, or public health and safety.

(b) In performing its duties, the division of the commission responsible for railroad safety shall exercise all powers of investigation granted to the commission, including rights to enter upon land or facilities, inspect books and records, and compel testimony. The commission shall employ sufficient federally certified inspectors to ensure at the time of inspection that railroad locomotives and equipment and facilities located in class I railroad yards in California are inspected not less frequently than every 180 days, and all main and branch line tracks are inspected not less frequently than every 12 months. In performing its duties, the division of the commission responsible for railroad safety shall consult with
 representatives of railroad corporations, labor organizations representing railroad employees, and the Federal Railroad Administration.

(c) The general counsel shall assign to the division of the commission responsible for railroad safety the personnel and attorneys necessary to fully utilize the powers granted to the commission by any state law and by any federal law relating to rail transportation, to enforce safety laws, rules, regulations, and orders, and to collect fines and penalties resulting from the violation of any safety rule or regulation.

(d) The activities of the division of the commission responsible for railroad safety that relate to safe operation of common carriers by rail, other than those relating to grade crossing protection, shall also be supported by the fees paid by railroad corporations, if any, pursuant to Sections 421 to 424, inclusive. The activities of
 the division of the commission responsible for railroad safety that relate to grade crossing protection shall be supported by funds appropriated therefor from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 6.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

No vacancy in the commission impairs the right of the remaining commissioners to exercise all the powers of the commission. A majority of the commissioners constitutes a quorum for the transaction of any business, for the performance of any duty, or for the exercise of any power of the commission. Any investigation, inquiry, or hearing which the commission may undertake or hold may be undertaken or held by or before any commissioner or commissioners designated for the purpose by the commission. The evidence in any investigation, inquiry, or hearing may be taken by the commissioner or commissioners to whom the investigation, inquiry, or hearing has been
 assigned or, in his, her, or their behalf, by an administrative law judge designated for that purpose. Every finding, opinion, and order made by the commissioner or commissioners so designated, pursuant to the investigation, inquiry, or hearing, when approved or confirmed by the commission and ordered filed in its office, is the finding, opinion, and order of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 160.)
-------------------------------------------

311.

(a) The commission, each commissioner, the executive director, and the assistant executive directors may administer oaths, certify to all official acts, and issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, waybills, books, accounts, documents, and testimony in any inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state.

(b) The administrative law judges may administer oaths, examine witnesses, issue subpoenas, and receive evidence, under rules that the commission adopts.

(c) The evidence in any hearing shall be taken by the commissioner or the administrative law judge designated for that purpose. The commissioner or the administrative law judge may receive and
 exclude evidence offered in the hearing in accordance with the rules of practice and procedure of the commission.

(d) Consistent with the procedures contained in Sections 1701.1, 1701.2, 1701.3, 1701.4, and 1701.8, the assigned commissioner or the administrative law judge shall prepare and file an opinion setting forth recommendations, findings, and conclusions. The opinion of the assigned commissioner or the administrative law judge is the proposed decision and a part of the public record in the proceeding. The proposed decision of the assigned commissioner or the administrative law judge shall be filed with the commission and served upon all parties to the action or proceeding without undue delay, not later than 90 days after the matter has been submitted for decision. The commission shall issue its decision not sooner than 30 days following filing and service of the proposed decision by the assigned commissioner or the administrative law
 judge, except that the 30-day period may be reduced or waived by the commission in an unforeseen emergency situation or upon the stipulation of all parties to the proceeding or as otherwise provided by law. The commission may, in issuing its decision, adopt, modify, or set aside the proposed decision or any part of the decision. Where the modification is of a decision in an adjudicatory hearing it shall be based upon the evidence in the record. Every finding, opinion, and order made in the proposed decision and approved or confirmed by the commission shall, upon that approval or confirmation, be the finding, opinion, and order of the commission.

(e) Any item appearing on the commission’s public agenda as an alternate item to a proposed decision or to a decision subject to subdivision (g) shall be served upon all parties to the proceeding without undue delay and shall be subject to public review and comment before it may be voted upon. For
 purposes of this subdivision, “alternate” means either a substantive revision to a proposed decision that materially changes the resolution of a contested issue or any substantive addition to the findings of fact, conclusions of law, or ordering paragraphs. The commission shall adopt rules that provide for the time and manner of review and comment and the rescheduling of the item on a subsequent public agenda, except that the item shall not be rescheduled for consideration sooner than 30 days following service of the alternate item upon all parties. The alternate item shall be accompanied by a digest that clearly explains the substantive revisions to the proposed decision. The commission’s rules may provide that the time and manner of review and comment on an alternate item may be reduced or waived by the commission in an unforeseen emergency situation.

(f) The commission may specify that the administrative law judge assigned to a proceeding
 involving an electrical, gas, telephone, railroad, or water corporation, or a highway carrier, initiated by customer or subscriber complaint need not prepare, file, and serve an opinion, unless the commission finds that to do so is required in the public interest in a particular case.

(g) (1) Before voting on any commission decision not subject to subdivision (d), the decision shall be served on parties and subject to at least 30 days public review and comment. Any alternate to any commission decision shall be subject to the same requirements as provided for alternate decisions under subdivision (e). For purposes of this subdivision, “decision” also includes resolutions, including resolutions on advice letter filings.

(2) The 30-day period may be reduced or waived in an unforeseen emergency situation, upon the stipulation of all parties in the proceeding, for
 an uncontested matter in which the decision grants the relief requested, or for an order seeking temporary injunctive relief, or, in the case of a catastrophic wildfire proceeding, may be reduced to no less than 15 days at the discretion of the assigned commissioner.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to uncontested matters that pertain solely to water corporations, or to orders instituting investigations or rulemakings, categorization resolutions under Sections 1701.1 to 1701.4, inclusive, and Section 1701.8, or orders authorized by law to be considered in executive session. Consistent with regulatory efficiency and the need for adequate prior notice and comment on commission decisions, the commission may adopt rules, after notice and comment, establishing additional categories of decisions subject to waiver or reduction of the time period in this section.

(h) Notwithstanding
 any other law, amendments, revisions, or modifications by the commission of its Rules of Practice and Procedure shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for prior review in accordance with Sections 11349, 11349.3, 11349.4, 11349.5, 11349.6, and 11350.3 of, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 11349.1 of, the Government Code. If the commission adopts an emergency revision to its Rules of Practice and Procedure based upon a finding that the revision is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, this emergency revision shall only be reviewed by the Office of Administrative Law in accordance with subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, of Section 11349.6 of the Government Code. The emergency revision shall become effective upon filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 120 days. A petition for writ of review pursuant to Section 1756 of a commission decision amending, revising, or modifying its Rules of Practice and
 Procedure shall not be filed until the regulation has been approved by the Office of Administrative Law, the Governor, or a court pursuant to Section 11350.3 of the Government Code. If the period for filing the petition for writ of review would otherwise have already commenced under Section 1733 or 1756 at the time of that approval, then the period for filing the petition for writ of review shall continue until 30 days after the date of that approval. This subdivision does not require the commission to comply with Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This subdivision is only intended to provide for the Office of Administrative Law review of procedural commission decisions relating to commission Rules of Practice and Procedure, and not general orders, resolutions, regulations, guidelines related to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), or other
 substantive regulations.

(i) The commission shall immediately notify the Legislature whenever the commission reduces or waives the time period for public review and comment due to an unforeseen emergency situation, as provided in subdivision (d), (e), or (g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 178.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

311.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall not consider or require, in determining qualified bidders for, or in awarding contracts, that any facilities be located within a particular area of the state, or within geographical proximity of any particular area of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 67, Sec. 39.   Effective July 6, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

311.2.

The commission shall adopt procedures authorizing the submittal of electronic signatures and documents by all parties on contracts involving the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

311.4.

(a) On or after July 1, 2001, the commission shall establish procedures to permit the submission of informal complaints through electronic means in accordance with this section.

(b) On or before January 1, 2002, the commission shall provide on its Internet Web site the means by which consumers may submit informal complaints through electronic means.

(c) For the purpose of this section, “electronic means” includes, but shall not be limited to, email or the Internet, or both.

(d) Upon the receipt of an informal complaint submitted by electronic means, the
 commission shall immediately forward the complaint to the entity named in the complaint.

(e) The commission shall permit the submission of informal complaints through electronic means, if, as determined by the commission, both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The dollar amount in the complaint does not exceed the jurisdictional limit of a small claims court specified in subdivision (a) of Section 116.220 or Section 116.221 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) The commission has addressed any impediments in the electronic systems employed by the commission that would prevent or substantially adversely affect the ability of the commission to receive informal complaints by electronic means.

(f) The commission shall include a notice on its Internet
 Web site of the availability of the procedures described in subdivision (a).

(g) For the purposes of implementing this section, the commission shall make available to the public an industry specific online complaint form that allows a customer to specify information that the commission determines to be relevant for purposes of resolving a dispute, including the account number, the type of dispute, and the opportunity to make general comments.

(h) This act may not be implemented, and no information technology-related preparatory work may be undertaken in connection with this act prior to July 1, 2001, without the concurrence of the commission and the authorization of the Department of Information Technology pursuant to Executive Order D-3-99.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 5.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

311.5.

(a) (1) Prior to commencement of any meeting at which commissioners vote on items on the public agenda, the commission shall make available to the public copies of the agenda, and upon request, any agenda item documents that are proposed to be considered by the commission for action or decision at a commission meeting.

(2) In addition, the commission shall publish the agenda, agenda item documents, and adopted decisions in a manner that makes copies of them easily available to the public, including publishing those documents on the Internet. Publication of the agenda and agenda item documents shall occur on the Internet at the
 same time as the written agenda and agenda item documents are made available to the public.

(b) The commission shall publish and maintain the following documents on the Internet:

(1) Each of the commission’s proposed and alternate proposed decisions and resolutions, until the decision or resolution is adopted and published.

(2) Each of the commission’s adopted decisions and resolutions. The publication shall occur within 10 days of the adoption of each decision or resolution by the commission.

(3) The then-current version of the commission’s general orders and Rules of Practice and Procedure.

(4) Each of the commission’s rulings. The commission shall maintain those rulings on its Internet Web site until final disposition, including disposition of any judicial appeals, of the respective proceedings in which the rulings were issued.

(5) A docket card that lists, by title and date of filing or issuance, all documents filed and all decisions or rulings issued in those proceedings, including the public versions of all prepared oral and written testimony and advice letter filings, protests, and responses. The commission shall maintain the docket card until final disposition, including disposition of any judicial appeals, of the corresponding proceedings.

(c) The commission shall make the following information available on the Internet:

(1) Information on how members of the public and ratepayers can gain access to the commission’s ratemaking process and information regarding the specific matters to be decided.

(2) Information on the operation of the office of the public advisor established in Section 321 and how the public advisor can connect members of the public to persons responsible for specific cases and matters to be decided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 808, Sec. 2.   (SB 512)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

312.

The commission and each commissioner may issue writs of summons, subpenas, warrants of attachment, warrants of commitment, and all necessary process in proceedings for contempt, in like manner and to the same extent as courts of record. The process issued by the commission or any commissioner, extends to all parts of the State and may be served by any person authorized to serve process of courts of record, or by any person designated by the commission or a commissioner. The person executing any such process shall receive such compensation as is allowed by the commission, not to exceed the fees prescribed by law on August 8, 1915, for similar services, and such fees shall be
 paid in the same manner as provided in this part for payment of the fees of witnesses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

313.

The commission may require, by order served on any public utility, the production within this State at such time and place as it designates, of any books, accounts, papers, or records kept by the public utility in any office or place without this State, or, at its option, verified copies in lieu thereof, so that an examination thereof may be made by the commission or under its direction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

314.

(a) The commission, each commissioner, and each officer and person employed by the commission may, at any time, inspect the accounts, books, papers, and documents of any public utility. The commission, each commissioner, and any officer of the commission or any employee authorized to administer oaths may examine under oath any officer, agent, or employee of a public utility in relation to its business and affairs. Any person, other than a commissioner or an officer of the commission, demanding to make any inspection shall produce, under the hand and seal of the commission, authorization to make the inspection. A written record of the testimony or statement so given under oath shall be made and filed with the commission.
